Tennessee, session 114, SB2679.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Bring Our National Guard
Home Act."
SECTION 2. No later than five (5) business days after the effective date of this act, the
governor shall rescind each order of deployment of members of the Tennessee national guard
outside of this state and recall all members of the Tennessee national guard who are deployed
outside of this state.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2679
010390
- 1 -